Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska24-811
Judicial nominating commissions; unlawful to attempt to influence; violations; penalty.

It shall be unlawful and a breach of ethics for any judge, public officeholder, lawyer or any other person or organization to attempt to influence any judicial nominating commission in any manner and on any basis except by presenting facts and opinions relevant to the judicial qualifications of the proposed nominees to an individual member of the commission or to the commission acting as a body, at or prior to the time of the public hearing. Violation of this section shall be considered as contempt of the Supreme Court of the State of Nebraska and shall be punishable as for contempt or by appropriate discipline with respect to any member of the bar involved in any such unlawful or unethical conduct.

Laws 1963, c. 124, § 11, p. 476;

Laws 1973, LB 110, § 8.